District of Columbia statutes.
38-1806.02

Duties of the Superintendent of the District of Columbia public schools.

The Superintendent is authorized to provide a grant to a private, nonprofit corporation that meets the eligibility criteria under § 38-1806.03 for the purposes of carrying out the duties under §§ 38-1806.04 and 38-1806.07.

History

Apr. 26, 1996, 110 Stat. 1321 [265], Pub. L. 104-134, § 2602

Section References

This section is referenced in § 38-1806.03.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 31-2853.62.